Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 19. Money Order Sellers and Money Transmitters.

§ 6.2-1900.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authorized delegate”
means a person designated or appointed by a licensee to sell money orders or provide money transmission services on behalf of the licensee.

“Licensee”
means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in the business of selling money orders or the business of money transmission, or both.

“Member”
means a person who owns or controls a 10 percent or greater interest in a limited liability company.

“Monetary value”
means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money.

“Money order”
means a check, traveler’s check, draft, or other instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value whether or not negotiable.

“Money order seller”
means a person engaged in the business of selling money orders.

“Money transmission”
means receiving money or monetary value for transmission by wire, facsimile, electronic means or other means or selling or issuing stored value.

“Money transmitter”
means a person engaged in the business of money transmission.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry”
or

“Registry”

means the licensing and registration system operated by the State Regulatory Registry LLC.

“Outstanding”
means:

With respect to a money order, a money order that has been issued and sold directly by a licensee, or sold by an authorized delegate of the licensee and reported to the licensee, that has not yet been paid by or on behalf of the licensee; or

With respect to a money transmission transaction, a money transmission transaction for which the licensee, directly or through an authorized delegate of the licensee, has received money or monetary value from a customer for transmission, but has not yet (i) completed the money transmission transaction by delivering the money or monetary value to the person designated by the customer, or (ii) refunded the money or monetary value to the customer.“Principal” means any person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls a 10 percent or greater interest in any form of entity.“Stored value” means monetary value that is evidenced by an electronic record.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-370; 1994, c. 889; 1998, c. 10; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454; 2019, c. 634.

Cross references.

As to retention of records for three years by any business association that sells travelers checks, money orders, or similar written instruments, see §

55.1-2537

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 added the definition of “Member.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634 inserted the definition of “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.”

§ 6.2-1901.
License required; exception.

No person shall engage in the business of selling money orders or engage in the business of money transmission, whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth, unless the person obtains from the Commission a license issued pursuant to this chapter.

No license under this chapter shall be required of any authorized delegate of a licensee.

Every person required to be licensed under this chapter shall register with the Registry and be subject to such registration and renewal requirements as may be established by the Registry, in addition to any requirements of this chapter. In adopting regulations pursuant to §

6.2-1913

, the Commission shall include any terms, conditions, or requirements applicable to such registration and renewal. Any fees required by the Registry shall be separate and apart from any fees imposed by this chapter. The Commission, at its discretion, may collect any registration and renewal fees on behalf of the Registry and remit such fees to the Registry or permit the Registry to collect any fees imposed by this chapter and remit such fees to the Commission.

In connection with its implementation and administration of this chapter, the Commission may establish agreements or contracts with the Registry or other entities designated by the Registry to collect, distribute, and maintain information and records and process fees related to persons required to be licensed under this chapter. In establishing such agreements or contracts, the Commission shall not be subject to the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

History.

1974, c. 578, §§ 6.1-371, 6.1-377; 1983, c. 156; 1987, c. 283; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2005, c. 314; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2019, c. 634.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634 added subsections C and D.

§ 6.2-1902.
Scope and construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

The United States, or any department, instrumentality or agency thereof;

Any state, or any department, instrumentality, agency, locality, municipality, or political subdivision thereof;

Any bank, trust company, savings institution, or credit union operating under the laws of the United States or any state or territory thereof, or other person to the extent the person provides money transmission services as an agent of one or more banks, trust companies, savings institutions, or credit unions operating under the laws of the United States or any state or territory thereof;

Any private security services business, licensed under §

9.1-139

, that transports or offers to transport money; or

Any entity that has been explicitly designated in a written agreement as an agent of any governmental authority or unit identified in subdivision 1 or 2, provided that any funds collected by the agent shall be deemed for all purposes to be received by the governmental authority or unit. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit the governmental authority or unit from seeking indemnification from its agent for any direct losses incurred due to the agent’s failure to remit funds in accordance with its agreement.

This chapter shall be construed by the Commission for the purpose of protecting, against financial loss, residents of the Commonwealth who (i) purchase money orders or (ii) give money or control of their funds or credit into the custody of another person for transmission, regardless of whether the money order seller or money transmitter has any office, facility, authorized delegate, or other physical presence in the Commonwealth.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-371; 1983, c. 156; 1987, c. 283; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2005, c. 314; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2013, c. 237.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 237, in subdivision A 1, substituted “Any state” for “The Commonwealth” and inserted “department, instrumentality, agency, locality, municipality, or”; added subdivision A 5; and made a related change.

§ 6.2-1903.
Application for license; financial statements; application fee.

Applications for a license shall be made on forms furnished by the Commissioner and shall set forth the name and address of the applicant, which shall be an entity, a description of the manner in which and the locations at which it proposes to do business, and such additional relevant information as the Commissioner requires. If any material information provided by the applicant changes during the investigation period, the applicant shall immediately notify the Commissioner.

The application shall be accompanied by such audited financial statements as the Commissioner may require and an application fee of $1,000. If an application for a license under this chapter is denied, the application fee shall not be refunded. The fee shall not be abated by the expiration, surrender, or revocation of the license.

History.

1974, c. 578, §§ 6.1-372, 6.1-373; 1987, c. 283; 1990, c. 259; 1992, c. 283; 1994, cc. 312, 889; 1996, c. 274; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 substituted “Commissioner” for “Commission” throughout the section; and in subsection A added the last sentence.

§ 6.2-1904.
Bond required.

The application for a license shall be accompanied by a surety bond satisfactory to the Commissioner in the principal amount as determined by the Commissioner. The amount of the bond shall be not less than $25,000 nor more than $ 1 million. The bond shall be conditioned upon the licensee (i) performing its obligations to purchasers, payees, and holders of money orders and money transmission services sold by the licensee and its authorized delegates and (ii) conducting the licensed business in conformity with this chapter.

As an alternative security device and in lieu of the surety bond required by subsection A, a license applicant may deposit with a financial institution designated by such applicant and approved by the Commissioner for that purpose, cash, stocks and bonds, notes, debentures or other obligations of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or guaranteed by the United States, or of the Commonwealth, or of a locality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, in an aggregate amount, based upon the principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, of not less than the amounts required by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection A. Such cash or securities shall be deposited and held to secure obligations established in subsection A, but the licensee shall be entitled to (i) receive all interest and dividends thereon and (ii) substitute, with the Commissioner’s prior approval, other securities for those deposited. The Commissioner may also direct the licensee, for good cause shown, to substitute other securities for those deposited.

The security device required by this section shall remain in place for five years after a licensee ceases money order sales or money transmission activities. The Commissioner may permit the security device to be reduced or eliminated prior to that time to the extent the amount of such licensee’s outstanding money orders and money transmission transactions are reduced. The Commissioner may also permit any licensee to substitute a letter of credit, or such other form of security device as may be acceptable to the Commissioner, for the security device in place at the time the licensee ceases money order sales or money transmission activities.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-372; 1987, c. 283; 1990, c. 259; 1992, c. 283; 1994, c. 889; 1996, c. 274; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 substituted “Commissioner” for “Commission” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “upon the licensee (i) performing its obligations” for “as the Commission may require for the benefit of,” inserted “and money transmission services,” substituted “and (ii) conducting the licensed business in conformity with this chapter” for “in the Commonwealth, and for the benefit of purchasers of money transmission services,” and deleted the last sentence, which read “If any material information provided to the Commission in an application changes during the investigation period, the applicant shall immediately notify the Commission”; and in subsection C, inserted “outstanding” and deleted “outstanding in the Commonwealth” following “transactions” and “in the Commonwealth” at the end.

§ 6.2-1904.1.
Investigation of applications.

The Commissioner may make such investigations as he deems necessary to determine if the applicant has complied with all applicable provisions of law and regulations adopted thereunder.

For the purpose of investigating individuals who are members, senior officers, directors, and principals of an applicant, such individuals shall comply with one or both of the following, as applicable:

In the case of members, senior officers, directors, and principals who have resided in the United States at any time within the previous 10 years, such individuals shall consent to a national and state criminal history records check and submit to fingerprinting. Each member, senior officer, director, and principal shall pay for the cost of such fingerprinting and criminal records check. Such individuals shall cause their fingerprints, personal descriptive information, and records check fees to be submitted to either of the following, as prescribed by the Commissioner:

The Bureau, which shall forward these items to the Central Criminal Records Exchange. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall (i) conduct a search of its own criminal history records and forward such individuals’ fingerprints and personal descriptive information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding such individuals and (ii) forward the results of the state and national records search to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission; or

The Registry, provided that it is capable of processing such criminal history records check.

In the case of members, senior officers, directors, and principals who have resided outside of the United States at any time within the previous 10 years, such individuals shall cause an investigative background report to be submitted to the Commissioner. The report shall be prepared by an independent search firm that is acceptable to the Commissioner and be in the English language. Each member, senior officer, director, and principal shall pay for the cost of such report, and the report shall be sent directly by the search firm to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission.

If any member, senior officer, director, or principal of an applicant fails to cause his fingerprints, personal descriptive information, records check fees, or investigative background report to be submitted in accordance with subsection B, the application for licensure shall be denied.

History.

2014, c. 454; 2019, c. 634.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634, in subdivision B 1, inserted “either of the following, as prescribed by”; in subdivision B 1 a, substituted “a. The Bureau. Which” for “who”; added subdivision B 1 b; and made stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-1905.
Annual fees; expenses; annual reports; renewal.

Each licensee shall pay to the Commission annually on or before December 31 a license renewal fee of $750. All fees paid pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the “Financial Institutions Special Fund — State Corporation Commission.”

In order to defray the costs of their examination and supervision, every licensee under this chapter shall pay an annual assessment calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. The schedule shall bear a reasonable relationship to the dollar volume of money orders sold and Virginia money transmission business conducted by licensees, either directly or through their authorized delegates, the costs of their examinations, and to other factors relating to their supervision and regulation. All such fees shall be assessed on or before August 1 for every calendar year. All such fees shall be paid by licensees to the State Treasurer on or before September 1 following each assessment.

In addition to the annual assessment prescribed in subsection B, when it becomes necessary to examine or investigate the affairs, business, premises, books, or records of a licensee or any of its authorized delegates at a location outside the Commonwealth, the licensee shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement, the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of its examination or investigation, or shall pay a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission.

Each licensee under this chapter shall file periodic written reports with the Commissioner or the Registry containing such information as the Commissioner may require concerning the licensee’s business and operations, including audited financial statements. Reports shall be in the form and be submitted with such frequency and by such dates as may be prescribed by the Commissioner. If a licensee is unable to furnish copies of its audited financial statements by the dates prescribed by the Commissioner, the licensee may request an extension, which may be granted by the Commissioner for good cause shown.

If a license has expired or has been surrendered or revoked, the former licensee shall immediately (i) cease selling money orders and engaging in the money transmission business, and (ii) instruct its authorized delegates to cease selling money orders and accepting funds for transmission on behalf of the licensee. The Commission may grant relief from this subsection for good cause shown.

A license issued under this chapter shall expire on December 31 of each year unless it is renewed by a licensee prior to the expiration date. A licensee may renew its license by (i) requesting renewal through the Registry; (ii) complying with any requirements associated with such renewal request that are imposed by the Registry; (iii) paying the license renewal fee prescribed in subsection A; (iv) paying the annual assessment prescribed in subsection B; (v) filing the periodic written reports and audited financial statements prescribed in subsection D; and (vi) maintaining the minimum net worth specified in subsection B of §

6.2-1906

, as evidenced by its audited financial statements. If the Commissioner finds that the licensee has satisfied these requirements, the Commissioner shall renew such person’s license. If a license has expired, the former licensee may seek reinstatement on or before the last day of February of the following calendar year. Upon finding that the former licensee has complied with the renewal requirements set forth in this subsection and remitted payment of a reinstatement fee of $1,000, the Commissioner shall reinstate such person’s license.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-373; 1987, c. 283; 1994, cc. 312, 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454; 2019, c. 634.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454, in subsection C, inserted “affairs, business, premises” and “or any of its authorized delegates,” substituted “or investigation” for “and supervision,” and made a stylistic change; deleted former subsection E, which read “Every license shall remain in force until it expires or has been surrendered or revoked. The expiration, surrender, or revocation of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of the licensee”; and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634, in subsection A, substituted “December 31” for “September 1”; rewrote subsections D through F.

§ 6.2-1906.
Conditions prerequisite to issuance of license; net worth requirement.

The Commission shall not issue a license to an applicant unless it determines that:

The applicant will be able to and will perform its obligations to purchasers of money transmission services and purchasers, payees, and holders of money orders sold by it and its authorized delegates; and

The financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, and principals are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with applicable law and regulations.

Each licensee shall at all times have a net worth of not less than $200,000, or a higher amount not to exceed $1 million as determined by the Commission, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-374; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454, in subdivision A 1, deleted “in the Commonwealth” at the end; and in subsection B, deleted the last sentence, which read “Any person who was licensed under this chapter on July 1, 2009, shall have three years from that date to comply with the minimum net worth requirement of this section, during which period the licensee shall at all times have a net worth of not less than $100,000, or a higher amount not to exceed $1 million as determined by the Commission, calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.”

§ 6.2-1906.1.
Licenses; places of business; changes.

Each license shall state the address at which the principal place of business is to be conducted and shall state fully the legal name of the licensee as well as any fictitious names by which the licensee is conducting business under this chapter. Licenses shall not be transferable or assignable, by operation of law or otherwise. No licensee shall use any names other than the legal name or fictitious names set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

Every licensee shall notify the Commissioner, in writing, at least 30 days prior to relocating its principal place of business and confirm the change in writing within five days after such relocation.

Every licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of (i) any change to its legal name, (ii) any change to or additional fictitious name by which the licensee is conducting business under this chapter, and (iii) the name, address, and position of each new member, senior officer, director, or principal. At the direction of the Commissioner, any such individual shall be treated as a member, senior officer, director, or principal of an applicant for the purpose of being investigated pursuant to subsection B of §

6.2-1904.1

. The licensee shall provide such other information with respect to the changes and persons identified in this subsection as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

Every license shall remain in force until it expires or has been surrendered or revoked. The expiration, surrender, or revocation of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of the licensee.

History.

2014, c. 454.

§ 6.2-1907.
License revocation.

The Commission may revoke a license issued under this chapter:

If it reasonably determines that (i) a licensee is engaging in one or more unsafe or unsound practices, (ii) a licensee may be unable to perform its obligations, or (iii) a licensee has willfully failed without reasonable cause to pay or provide for the payment of any of its obligations; or

Upon any of the following grounds:

Any ground for denial of a license under this chapter;

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or a violation of any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a judgment against such licensee involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a federal or state administrative order against such licensee for violation of any law or any regulation applicable to the conduct of his business;

Refusal to permit an investigation or examination by the Commission;

Failure to pay any fee or assessment imposed by this chapter; or

Failure to comply with any order of the Commission.

For the purposes of this section, acts of any officer, director, member, partner, or principal shall be deemed acts of the licensee.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-374; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 deleted former subsection A, which read “The Commissioner may make such investigations as he deems necessary to determine if the applicant has complied with all applicable provisions of law and regulations adopted thereunder”; redesignated former subsection B as subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 6.2-1908.
Notice of proposed revocation.

The Commission may not revoke a license issued under this chapter upon any of the grounds set forth in §

6.2-1907

until it has given the licensee 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed revocation and has given the licensee an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such licensee and shall state with particularity the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person or persons named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not revoke the license except based upon findings made at such hearing.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-374.1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1909.
Cease and desist orders.

If the Commission determines that (i) any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted hereunder or (ii) a licensee is engaging in one or more unsafe or unsound practices, the Commission may, upon 21 days’ notice in writing, order such person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the provisions of this chapter. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the principal place of business of such person or other address authorized under §

12.1-19.1

and shall state the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person or persons named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. The Commission may enforce compliance with any such order issued under this section by imposition and collection of such fines and penalties as may be prescribed by law.

When, in the opinion of the Commission, immediate action is required to protect the public interest, a cease and desist order may be issued immediately without prior hearing. In such cases, the Commission shall make a hearing available to the person on an expedited basis.

If required to conserve the assets of a licensee or protect the public interest, the Commission may order a licensee and its authorized delegates to cease and desist from selling additional money orders or receiving additional funds for transmission.

The Commission shall have jurisdiction to enter and enforce a cease and desist order against any person, regardless of whether such person is present in the Commonwealth, who directly or indirectly (i) sells money orders to citizens of the Commonwealth or (ii) obtains money or control over such citizens’ funds for transmission.

History.

2009, c. 346, § 6.1-374.2; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1910.
Investigations; examinations; reporting violations.

The Commission shall have authority to investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, books, and records of all money order sellers and money transmitters and their authorized delegates. Except as provided herein, the Commission shall make an examination of each licensee at least once in every three-year period and shall adjust the surety bond or alternative security device as it may deem necessary in accordance with §

6.2-1904

. The Commission may also examine any authorized delegate of a licensee as often as it is deemed to be in the public interest. Examinations under this section may be conducted in conjunction with examinations to be performed by representatives of agencies of the federal government or another state. The Commission, in lieu of an examination, may accept the examination report of the federal government or another state.

Any person designated by the Commission to make investigations or examinations pursuant to this section shall have authority to (i) administer oaths; (ii) examine under oath in the course of such investigations or examinations, the principals, members, owners, officers, directors, partners, and employees of any person required to be licensed by this chapter or such person’s authorized delegates; and (iii) compel the production of documents. The principals, members, owners, officers, directors, partners, and employees of any person being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all premises, books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary.

The Commission shall report violations of the licensing requirements of §

6.2-1901

to the attorney for the Commonwealth of the city or county in which such violation occurs.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-375; 1976, c. 531; 1990, c. 259; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454, in subsection A, inserted “investigate and” and “affairs, business, premises,” substituted “and their” for “either directly or through” in the first sentence, deleted “of the books and records” following “examination” in the second sentence, and “the books and records of” following “also examine” in the third sentence; and in subsection B, inserted “investigations or” twice and “members, owners,” and added the last sentence.

§ 6.2-1911.
Conduct of business through authorized delegates of licensee.

A licensee may conduct its business through or by means of such authorized delegates as the licensee may designate or appoint under a written agreement with such authorized delegates. The agreement between a licensee and an authorized delegate shall (i) require the authorized delegate to comply with the provisions of this chapter and all other applicable state and federal laws and regulations; (ii) require the authorized delegate to remit all sums owing to the licensee in accordance with the terms of the written agreement; (iii) require the authorized delegate to permit the Commission to investigate or examine its business pursuant to §

6.2-1910

; and (iv) prohibit the authorized delegate from using a subdelegate, or from otherwise designating or appointing another person to sell money orders or engage in money transmission business on behalf of the licensee.

A licensee shall conduct a due diligence review of all new authorized delegates. A licensee shall be responsible for implementing and maintaining a reasonable risk-based supervision program to monitor its authorized delegates.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-377; 1994, c. 889; 2001, c. 372; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1912.
Liability of licensee for payment of money order; money order to bear name of licensee.

A licensee shall be liable for the payment of all funds collected for transmission by the licensee or its authorized delegates and all money orders which it sells, in whatever form and whether directly or through an authorized delegate, as the maker or drawer thereof according to the negotiable instrument laws of the Commonwealth. A licensee who sells a money order, whether directly or through an authorized delegate, upon which he is not designated as maker or drawer shall nevertheless have the same liabilities with respect thereto as if he had signed the money order as the maker or drawer thereof.

Every money order sold by a licensee, whether directly or through an authorized delegate, shall bear the name of the licensee clearly imprinted thereon as it appears on its license.

History.

1974, c. 578, § 6.1-378; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1913.
Regulations.

The Commission may adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

History.

1990, c. 259, § 6.1-378.1; 1994, c. 889; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1914.
Acquisition of control; application.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire directly or indirectly 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation or 25 percent or more of the ownership of any other entity licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless such person first:

Files an application with the Commission in such form as the Commission may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such information as the Commission may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors, senior officers, principals, and members, and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, or members of the licensee;

Furnishes to the Commissioner information concerning the identity of the directors, senior officers, principals, and members of the applicant, and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, or members of the licensee. For the purpose of investigating these directors, senior officers, principals, and members, such individuals shall comply with one or both of the following, as applicable:

In the case of directors, senior officers, principals, and members who have resided in the United States at any time within the previous 10 years, such individuals shall consent to a national and state criminal history records check and submit to fingerprinting. Each director, senior officer, principal, and member shall pay for the cost of such fingerprinting and criminal records check. Such individuals shall cause their fingerprints, personal descriptive information, and records check fees to be submitted to either of the following, as prescribed by the Commissioner:

The Bureau, which shall forward these items to the Central Criminal Records Exchange. The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall (i) conduct a search of its own criminal history records and forward such individuals’ fingerprints and personal descriptive information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information regarding such individuals, and (ii) forward the results of the state and national records search to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission; or

The Registry, provided that it is capable of processing such criminal history records check.

In the case of directors, senior officers, principals, and members who have resided outside of the United States at any time within the previous 10 years, such individuals shall cause an investigative background report to be submitted to the Commissioner. The report shall be prepared by an independent search firm that is acceptable to the Commissioner and be in the English language. Each director, senior officer, principal, and member shall pay for the cost of such report, and the report shall be sent directly by the search firm to the Commissioner or his designee, who shall be an employee of the Commission; and

Pays such application fee as the Commission may prescribe.

If any material information provided by the applicant changes during the investigation period, the applicant shall immediately notify the Commissioner.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the Commission shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it finds that the applicant, its members if applicable, its directors, senior officers, and principals, and any proposed new directors, members, senior officers, and principals have the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with the applicable laws and regulations. The Commission shall grant or deny the application within 90 days from the date a completed application, accompanied by the required fee, is filed unless the period is extended by the Commission. If the application is denied, the Commission shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the acquisition of an interest in a licensee directly or indirectly by merger, consolidation, or otherwise, (i) by or with a person licensed under this chapter, (ii) by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee, or (iii) by bequest, descent, survivorship, or by operation of law. The person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction which is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice to the Commission of such acquisition within 30 days after its closing.

If any person acquires an ownership interest in a licensee without obtaining prior approval from the Commission as required by this section, the Commission may for good cause shown order such person to divest himself or itself of such ownership interest.

The Commission may not enter an order requiring divestiture pursuant to subsection E until it has given the person 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed divestiture and has given the person an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to such person and shall state with particularity the grounds for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the person named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not require divestiture except based upon findings made at such hearing.

History.

1998, c. 10, § 6.1-378.2; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794; 2014, c. 454; 2019, c. 634.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 454 added subdivision A 3 and made related changes; and in subsection B, substituted “by the applicant” for “to the Commission in an application” and “Commissioner” for “Commission.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 634, in subdivision A 3 a., inserted “either of the following, as prescribed by”; in subdivision A 3 a (1), substituted “(1) The Bureau, which” for “who” at the beginning; added subdivision A 3 a (2); and made stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-1915.
Sale or issuance of bearer money orders; prohibition.

No authorized delegate of a licensee shall sell a money order with a face amount of $750 or more that does not designate a specific payee.

This section applies only to paper money orders.

This section does not apply to (i) travelers checks, (ii) electronic instruments, (iii) stored value products or other similar instruments for the transmission or payment of money, or (iv) money orders sold or issued by insured financial institutions.

Licensees shall inform their authorized delegates of the obligations imposed by this section.

History.

1999, c. 355, § 6.1-378.3; 2009, c. 346; 2010, c. 794.